District of Columbia statutes.
48-842.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Medication advisory committee” means any committee or panel that is responsible for making recommendations or decisions regarding a formulary to be used by a health program administered by the government of the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Pharmaceutical company” means any entity that is engaged in, either directly or indirectly, the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, manufacturing, conversion or processing of a drug or biological product, including any person acting as its agent or representative.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 302, 55 DCR 1659